Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3,191
Alternative fuel; fee.

(1) In addition to any other fee required under the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, a fee for registration of each motor vehicle powered by an alternative fuel shall be charged. The fee shall be:

(a) For a motorcycle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle, seventy-five dollars;

(b) For any commercially registered alternative fuel vehicle that is not registered pursuant to section 60-3,198 and that has a gross weight of more than seven thousand five hundred pounds, three times the applicable fee for other motor vehicles powered by an alternative fuel as described in subdivision (1)(c) of this section; or

(c) For any other motor vehicle powered by an alternative fuel, one hundred fifty dollars.

(2) The fee shall be collected by the county treasurer and remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Highway Trust Fund.

Laws 2011, LB289, § 24;

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 62;

Laws 2026, LB207, § 1.
July 18, 2026